Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-1103. When committee functions — Administrative responsibilities.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall function during the interim between regular sessions, fiscal sessions, or special sessions of the General Assembly and may function, if necessary, while the General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, special session, or an extension of a regular session, fiscal session, or special session, for the purpose of discharging its duties under this subchapter.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall administer all provisions of this subchapter relating to repairs, improvements, and furnishing of committee rooms and legislative facilities in the State Capitol Building, including, if necessary, the payment of rental required for the housing of state agencies moved from the State Capitol Building as a result of any project undertaken by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter until space for the agencies may be provided in other public facilities.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 22.

10-3-1104. Powers and duties.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall review the existing usage of the space presently used by the General Assembly in the State Capitol Building and shall make such reallocations thereof or improvements thereto as in the judgment of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities are necessary to serve the needs of the Senate and the House of Representatives, their respective standing committees, and the several interim committees of the General Assembly and legislative staff services.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities may undertake any or all of the improvements contemplated in this subchapter after conferring with the Legislative Council, the agencies affected, and the Governor, giving due consideration to the needs and convenience of the several state agencies presently housed in the State Capitol Building in space to be converted to legislative use, and especially after considering the plans for providing space for the agencies in a state office building, and may undertake improvements as a single project or in a series of projects as the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities may determine to be in the best interest of the General Assembly.

[Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 23; 2013, No. 1465, § 3.

10-3-1105. Rooms in State Capitol Building assigned for use of General Assembly.

There is assigned in the State Capitol Building for the exclusive and continual use of the General Assembly, its members, its agencies, and its committees the three (3) rooms on the west wing of the third floor, these being rooms heretofore occupied by the Arkansas State History Museum.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 131, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-117.

Cross References. Official meeting place, §10-3-405.

10-3-1106. Additional legislative space.

In addition to the space now provided in the State Capitol Building for the General Assembly and its committees, the following additional space in the State Capitol Building is designated as legislative space if the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities determines that it is needed for legislative committee space or for other legislative facilities:

The office space on the north wing of the first floor of the State Capitol Building currently used by the Office of State Procurement, the Division of Correction, the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, and the Department of Commerce;

The office space on the west side of the first floor of the State Capitol Building presently used by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, which shall be made available to Arkansas Legislative Audit, or such other legislative uses as may be determined by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities;

The office space on the southeast wing of the first floor of the State Capitol Building presently assigned to the Accounting Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, and any other portion of the space assigned to the Department of Finance and Administration the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities determines is needed for legislative use;

The office space on the southeast wing of the second floor of the State Capitol Building currently assigned for use by the Budget Division of the Department of Finance and Administration. The space now provided for the Arkansas Economic Development Commission on the southwest wing of the second floor of the State Capitol Building shall be made available for the Budget Division of the Department of Finance and Administration unless the director determines that the location of the Budget Division in some other facilities would be more advantageous to the agency;

The former Supreme Court Chamber on the south end of the second floor of the State Capitol Building, to be air conditioned and serve as a large Senate committee room, but preserving the present decor of the chamber, i.e., changes contemplated involve only such things as air conditioning, carpeting, repainting, improved lighting, and installation of sound and recording equipment, and necessary committee tables and chairs, and other minor changes, essentially preserving the room in its present state; and

The space presently assigned Arkansas Legislative Audit on the west portion of the fourth floor of the State Capitol Building shall be available for the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative Council, Budget and Fiscal Review Section, or such other uses as determined by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities.

Publisher's Notes. This section refers to the allocation of space to various governmental entities as they existed at the time of its enactment.

The Division of Purchasing probably refers to the Purchasing Division of the State Administration Department. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 5, in part, transferred the State Administration Department to the Department of Finance and Administration. Acts 1979, No. 482, § 13, created the Office of State Purchasing within the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Commerce was abolished by Acts 1983, No. 691, § 1. That section further provided that the various departments, agencies, boards, commissions, programs, and services transferred to the Department of Commerce as enumerated in the act would be detached from the department and restored, as of July 1, 1983, to the status in which each such department, agency, etc., existed prior to the passage of Acts 1971, No. 38, or prior to its transfer to the Department of Commerce by acts subsequent to Acts 1971, No. 38. Acts 1983, No. 691, § 17, provided, in part, that any program, function, or duty then being performed by or within the Department of Commerce which was not specifically detached therefrom under the provisions of the act would be performed by the detached agency, department, board, or commission to which it was assigned within the Department of Commerce; if the program, function, or duty was not specifically assigned to an agency, department, board, or commission which was detached under the provisions of the act the Governor could, by proclamation, transfer and allocate the program, function, or duty to the appropriate state agency, as determined by the Governor, for its administration.

The Accounting Division of the Department of Finance and Administration referred to in subdivision (3) of this section, and the Budget Division of the Department of Finance and Administration referred to in subdivision (4) of this section, probably refer to the Budget and Accounting Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The director referred to in subdivision (4) is an apparent reference to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (2) and (6).

The 2019 amendment, in (1), substituted “Office of State Procurement” for “Division of Purchasing” and “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism”.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141; Acts 1997, No. 540, § 13; 2015, No. 554, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5550.

10-3-1107. Allocation of space for General Assembly — Furnishings.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall determine the best and most efficient means of allocating the additional space in the State Capitol Building, as provided by this subchapter, to be used by the Senate and the House of Representatives and for providing space for staff for the General Assembly, for either house of the General Assembly, and interim committees thereof.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall provide for supplying the furnishings for any additional space for use by the Senate and the House of Representatives pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, provided that all furnishings shall be purchased in accordance with competitive bids awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, as required by the purchasing laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-142.

10-3-1108. Employment of architect.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall have the authority to employ an architect to prepare plans and specifications for the work to be done, to supervise the construction, and to furnish other architectural services which the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities may require in the performance of its duties, and for that purpose the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities may enter into contracts with the architect. The fee which may be paid the architect shall not exceed nine percent (9%) of the cost of the project. Any contract shall provide that the architect shall furnish without additional cost to the state such services as may be required in the performance of the work.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141.

10-3-1109. Contracts.

Construction work to be performed shall be under contract, to be awarded by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities to the lowest responsible bidder, but the total cost of the project, including cost of publishing legal notices, payment of architect fees, payments to contractors, and all other expenses of whatever nature incident to and reasonably necessary in connection with the project shall not exceed the appropriation provided for it.

All expenditures of funds shall be in strict compliance with the applicable provisions of the fiscal laws of this state pertaining to the expenditure of public funds and the state purchasing laws of this state.

All contracts let under the provisions of this subchapter shall be subject to the approval of the Governor, the Auditor of State, and the Treasurer of State, as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Section 15 [repealed].

All actions by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities in relation to the work to be performed under contracts shall be in strict compliance with the applicable provisions of §§ 22-9-202 — 22-9-204.

All payments to contractors under contracts let under the provisions of this subchapter shall be made only after the approval of the amounts thereof by the architect.

All contracts which the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities proposes to enter into shall be subject to the approval as to form only by the Attorney General.

Publisher's Notes. Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 15, referred to in (a)(3), was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 54, § 2.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning disbursing agent, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1465, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141; Acts 1987, No. 968, § 2.

10-3-1110. [Repealed.]

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall be the disbursing officer for the funds appropriated to the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities, and all disbursements shall be upon the direction or authorization of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 197, § 2.

Subchapter 12

— Arkansas Communications Study Committee

10-3-1201 — 10-3-1205. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas Communications Study Committee, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 914, § 26. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-3-1201. Acts 1975, No. 326, § 1; 1977, No. 884, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1418.

10-3-1203. Acts 1975, No. 326, §§ 2, 3; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1059, § 1; 1977, No. 884, §§ 20, 21; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1419, 5-1420.

10-3-1205. Acts 1975, No. 326, § 3; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1059, § 1; 1977, No. 884, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1420.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§10-3-1301 —10-3-1303 and10-3-1320 —10-3-1322 may not apply to §10-3-1323 which was enacted subsequently.

Preambles. Acts 1987, No. 517 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the children of this Nation face a myriad of problems; and

“Whereas, legislative matters affecting children are assigned to many different standing committees which results in lack of comprehensive planning for children's needs and services and too often children fall through the cracks;

“Whereas, recent federal legislation has been introduced which would encourage state planning to develop a unified policy for all children; and

“Whereas, the consolidation of children's issues for review by a single legislative committee would insure that complex, interdisciplinary problems affecting children and funding needed for delivery of services to children would receive a more thorough consideration of the General Assembly; and

“Whereas, it is in the public interest that the General Assembly cooperate with the Governor, the various federal and state agencies and the Congress in making continual review of the problems and needs of children, and to explore means by which this State can address and resolve those problems in a comprehensive manner;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1987, No. 517, § 7: Apr. 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the future well being of the State of Arkansas lies in a good beginning for each child; that the problems facing the children of our society pose an immediate and future peril to the health, safety and welfare of the people of this State and immediate steps are necessary to coordinate planning and development of comprehensive legislation to meet the needs of children and youth, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly to establish a standing committee which will make studies, not only during regular session of the General Assembly, but in the interim period between legislative sessions designed to keep the General Assembly of this State fully in contact with the development of meaningful solutions to the problems facing children and youth, and in the development of legislation to carry out such solutions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 517, § 10: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws concerning certain committees of the House of Representatives and the General Assembly are in need of clarification and revision for the efficient operation of the General Assembly and that this act is immediately necessary to assist the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly in carrying out its duties. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1033, § 6: Apr. 12, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary for the Joint Committee on Children and Youth to have ample time to prepare for taking over the duties relating to oversight of the Arkansas Child Welfare Reform Document and the Angela R., et al. v. Bill Clinton, et al. consent decree. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 312, § 24: Feb. 28, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the duties of the Joint Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall be transferred to the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth; that such transfer should begin upon the adjournment of this Regular Session; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted the transfer will not occur until ninety days past the Regular Session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

10-3-1301. Construction.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be in addition and supplemental to the laws of this state and the Rules of the House of Representatives and the Rules of the Senate pertaining to the standing and interim committees of the General Assembly and of the House of Representatives and Senate and shall repeal only such laws or parts of laws as may be specifically in conflict with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 517, § 6.

10-3-1302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the creation, membership, and cochairmen of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 312, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 517, §§ 1, 2; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 29, § 1; 1993, No. 517, § 5.

10-3-1303. Duties.

The Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall make continuing studies and shall cooperate with the appropriate agencies of this state, agencies of the United States Government, and the Congress of the United States in the exchange and dissemination of information and in the development of legislation designed to coordinate planning and to try new ways to prevent young people from falling through the cracks.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 517, § 2; 1991, No. 555, § 1; 1997, No. 312, § 10.